Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.045

Crime victims' compensation account—Created.

The crime victims' compensation account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the crime victims' compensation program under this chapter. Only the director of the department or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2010 c 122 s 3.]